finished/ood.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [V] [N] [FUT] [PRS] [IPFV] [IMP] [PRF] [PL] [SG] [REDUP] @U.Redup.Y@ @U.Redup.N@ ă d̥ ĕ ĭ s̥ ^X ^V @U.StemChg.Y@ @U.StemChg.N@
 

LEXICON Root

          Prefix;


LEXICON Prefix
@U.Redup.N@                                  Prefix2;
@U.Redup.N@s-:@U.Redup.N@s-                  Prefix2;
@U.Redup.N@S-:@U.Redup.N@S-                  Prefix2;
@U.Redup.Y@:@U.Redup.Y@[REDUP] 	       Prefix2;
@U.Redup.Y@s-:@U.Redup.Y@s-[REDUP] 	       Prefix2;
@U.Redup.Y@S-:@U.Redup.Y@S-[REDUP] 	       Prefix2;

Lexicon Prefix2
@U.StemChg.N@    Lemma;
@U.StemChg.Y@    Stem;

LEXICON Stem !for stem changes
gi%:g:gi%:k Class5;

ka%:c:we%:c  Class5.5;
ke%:k:gegok  Class5.5;
daʼa:ñe%:ñeʼe Class5.5;
ciñ:ce%:ceñ	   Class5.5;


LEXICON Lemma

!!STEMS unchanged stems from Stem
gi%:g                   Class5;       

ka%:c                     Class5.5;
ke%:k                     Class5.5;   !this doesn't really work
daʼa                      Class5.5;
ciñ	   Class5.5;


!!CLASS 1 Redup on plurals

Milga%:n    Class1;
ba%:ñimad  Class1;
ban	   Class1;
ba%:ñimad   Class1;
bi%:dagĭ   Class1;
bo%:l	   Class1;
ca%:ŋgo	   Class1;
ceggia	   Class1;
cendad	   Class1;
ceoj	   Class1;
ceposid	   Class1;
cewaj	   Class1;
ceñ	   Class1;
daikud̥     Class1;
da%:d	   Class1;
da%:k	   Class1;
dahă	   Class1;
dai	   Class1;
doʼag	   Class1;
elpig	   Class1;
gaswuakud̥  Class1;
ga%:t	   Class1;
gaswua	   Class1;
gatwidakud̥ Class1;
gogs	   Class1;
golonakud̥	   Class1;
ha%:l	   Class1;
haiwañ	   Class1;
hajuñ	   Class1;
hemajkam	   Class1;
ha%:s̥añ      Class1;
haʼa       Class1;
hi%:wodag	   Class1;
hu%:c	   Class1;
hu%:ñ	   Class1;
huasaʼa	   Class1;
huc	   Class1;
hud̥	   Class1;
huhasaʼa	   Class1;
huʼul	   Class1;
jeʼes	   Class1;
ka%:m	   Class1;
kahio	   Class1;
kahon	   Class1;
kamis̥	   Class1;
kawyu	   Class1;
ki%:	   Class1;
kotoñ	   Class1;
kownal	   Class1;
kui	   Class1;
kuint		Class1;
ma%:gina	   Class1;
mad̥ 	   Class1;
makai	   Class1;
mas̥camakud̥	   Class1;
mas̥camdam	   Class1;
mi%:sa	   Class1;
mi%:stol	   Class1;
moʼo      Class1;
na%:k	   Class1;
na%:dakud̥   Class1;
nawoj	   Class1;
nowĭ	   Class1;
onpig	   Class1;
pa%:do	   Class1;
pa%:l	   Class1;
pa%:la	   Class1;
pa%:n	   Class1;
pa%:nt	   Class1;
pa%:ntakud̥	   Class1;
pikcult	   Class1;
pikcultakud̥	   Class1;
pisaltakud̥	   Class1;
potol	   Class1;
pualt	   Class1;
si%:s̥p	   Class1;
si%:s̥pakud̥	   Class1;
siʼikud̥	   Class1;
s̥a%:yo	   Class1;
s̥aliwĭ	   Class1;
s̥onwuinakud̥	   Class1;
s̥onwuikud̥    Class1;
s̥opolk
oam     Class1;
tad̥	   Class1;
tapial	   Class1;
tianda	   Class1;
to%:nk	   Class1;
to%:bĭ     Class1;
towa	   Class1;
wacwi	   Class1;
wainom	   Class1;
wakial 	   Class1;
wakon	   Class1;
wisilo	   Class1;
wonam	   Class1;
wowoit	   Class1;
woʼikud̥	   Class1;
wosk       Class1;
wud̥akud̥    Class1;
ñeok	   Class1;
ñeʼe	   Class1;
ʼasuppa	   Class1;
ʼes̥	   Class1;
ʼeñigadad	   Class1;
ʼi%:bhai	   Class1;
ʼipud̥	   Class1;
ʼispul	   Class1;
ʼo%:bĭ 	   Class1;
ʼo%:gĭ	   Class1;
ʼonmad	   Class1;
ʼu%:gk	   Class1;
ʼuwĭ	   Class1;
woʼo	   Class1;
si%:s̥pakud̥  Class1;
Sinad̥     Class1;
baga	   Class1;
cuk	   Class1;
Cukcu     Class1;
da%:pk	   Class1;
gakĭ	   Class1;
hemajima	   Class1;
kawi%:magĭ	   Class1;
kawk	   Class1;
mohogĭ	   Class1;
moik	   Class1;
nakosig   Class1;
nalas̥magĭ	   Class1;
namkig	   Class1;
pa%:ntakud̥ Class1;
padma	   Class1;
wagima	   Class1;
we%:c	   Class1;
wegĭ	   Class1;
wihonig	   Class1;
wuhĭ     Class1;


!!CLASS 1.5 guesser, no redup


!!CLASS 2  (redup + drop last letter in PRF)


gatwid     Class2;
he%:lwuin     Class2;
hikck     Class2;            
hi%:nk	   Class2;
ko%:s̥	   Class2;
ma%:k	   Class2;
med̥        Class2;
celkon     Class2;
celpig     Class2;
dagkon	   Class2;
hagpig	   Class2;
him       Class2;
hukpig	   Class2;
huks̥an     Class2;
ʼed̥apig    Class2;
ʼelkon    Class2;
ʼonpig	   Class2;
ʼod̥pig     Class2;
ñeok       Class2;
heʼed̥kad   Class2;



!!CLASS 2.5  (redup + drop last letters - multiple in PRF)


wamigid	   Class2.5;
wamigĭ	   Class2.5;
ceposid    Class2.5;
cipkan	   Class2.5;


 

!!CLASS 3 (same as 2 w/o Redup)


ceʼewid    Class3;
wu%:d̥	    Class3;
a%:gid      Class3;     !not working
giʼipig     Class3;  
bisc        Class3;
golon       Class3;
hehem       Class3;
huhuʼid     Class3;
ʼi%:e       Class3;
ʼoimed̥      Class3;
ʼoʼohan     Class3;
ʼu:hum      Class3;
ñeid        Class3;
s̥onhin      Class3;
wu%:s̥ad     Class3;
ʼelid       Class3;
baʼa        Class3;
ju%:k	     Class3;
waid        Class3;


!!CLASS 3.5 (same as 2.5 w/o Redup)


hu%:kajid   Class3.5; 
gegosid     Class3.5;
wupd̥a       Class3.5;
wohocid     Class3.5;


!!CLASS 4 (almost same as 1, except [PRF][PL][PRS] doesn't allow redup)


tohă         Class4;


!!CLASS 4.5 (same as 2, except [PRF][PL][PRS] doesn't allow redup)


na%:d	   Class4.5;


!!CLASS 5 Stem Changes in PL, yes redup


!!CLASS 5.5 Stem Changes in PL, no redup  

!!CLASS 6 same as 1, but extra push for vowel drop
Ci%:no     Class6;
kalit      Class6;
kulañmad	   Class6;
li%:wa	   Class6;
lo%:go	   Class6;
mu%:la 	   Class6;
to%:lo	   Class6;
s̥oiga     Class6;
we%:nag     Class6;
wu%:lo	   Class6;
wegid	   Class6;



LEXICON Class1
[N][SG]:0			End1;
[N][PL]:0			End2;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ		End2;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:0		End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0		End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad  	End2;

LEXICON Class1.5 !same as foma guesser
[N][SG]:0			        End1;
[N][PL]:0			        End1;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ    		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ    		End1;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:0 		       End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:0		       End1;  
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		        End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	        End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0	                End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad 	                End1;

LEXICON Class2
[N][SG]:0			End1;
[N][PL]:0			End2;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ		End2;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:X		End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:X		End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0		End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad  	End2;

LEXICON Class2.5
[N][SG]:0			End1;
[N][PL]:0			End2;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ		End2;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:^X		End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:^X		End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0		End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad  	End2;

LEXICON Class3
[N][SG]:0			End1;
[N][PL]:0			End1;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:X		End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:X		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad  	End1;

LEXICON Class3.5
[N][SG]:0			End1;
[N][PL]:0			End1;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:^X		End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:^X		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad  	End1;

LEXICON Class4 
[N][SG]:0			End1;
[N][PL]:0			End2;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ		End2;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:0		End1;  !only dif from Class1
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0		End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad  	End2;

LEXICON Class4.5
[N][SG]:0			End1;
[N][PL]:0			End2;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ		End2;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:X		End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:X		End1;  !only dif from Class1
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0		End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad  	End2;

LEXICON Class5 !stem chg redup
[N][SG]:0			        End1;
[N][PL]:0			        End4;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ    		End1;    ### should this ahave stm chg
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ    		End4;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:0 		       End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:0		       End4;  
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		        End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	        End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0	                End4;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad 	                End4;

LEXICON Class5.5 !stem chg no redup
[N][SG]:0			        End1;
[N][PL]:0			        End3;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ    		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ    		End3;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:0 		       End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:0		       End3;  
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		        End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	        End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:0	                End3;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad 	                End3;

LEXICON Class6 !drop last vowel of redup
[N][SG]:0			End1;
[N][PL]:^V			End2;
[V][IMP][SG][PRS]:iñ		End1;
[V][IMP][PL][PRS]:iñ^V		End2;
[V][PRF][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][PRF][PL][PRS]:^V		End2;
[V][IPFV][SG][PRS]:0		End1;
[V][IPFV][SG][FUT]:ad  	End1;
[V][IPFV][PL][PRS]:^V		End2;
[V][IPFV][PL][FUT]:ad^V  	End2;

LEXICON End1
@U.Redup.N@@U.StemChg.N@   #;

LEXICON End2
@U.Redup.Y@@U.StemChg.N@   #;

LEXICON End3
@U.Redup.N@@U.StemChg.Y@   #;

LEXICON End4
@U.Redup.Y@@U.StemChg.Y@   #;
